incubator/apertium-ru-cu/apertium-ru-cu.ru.dix
    <!-- [m.3b/ani] бык__n -->
    <pardef n="бык__n">
      <e c="m.3b/ani">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="ani"/><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а`</l>
          <r><s n="ani"/><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а`</l>
          <r><s n="ani"/><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е`</l>
          <r><s n="ani"/><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>у`</l>
          <r><s n="ani"/><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>о`м</l>
          <r><s n="ani"/><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и`</l>
          <r><s n="ani"/><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>о`в</l>
          <r><s n="ani"/><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>о`в</l>
          <r><s n="ani"/><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а`х</l>
          <r><s n="ani"/><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а`м</l>
          <r><s n="ani"/><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а`ми</l>
          <r><s n="ani"/><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- [m.3c(1)] берег__n -->
    <pardef n="берег__n">
      <e c="m.3c(1)">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>у`</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>у</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ом</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а`</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а`</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>о`в</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а`х</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а`м</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а`ми</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- [m.3e] бог__n -->
    <pardef n="бо/г__n">
      <e c="m.3e">
        <p>
          <l>г</l>
          <r>г<s n="ani"/><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>га</l>
          <r>г<s n="ani"/><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>га</l>
          <r>г<s n="ani"/><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ге</l>
          <r>г<s n="ani"/><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>гу</l>
          <r>г<s n="ani"/><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>гом</l>
          <r>г<s n="ani"/><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>же</l>
          <r>г<s n="ani"/><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ги</l>
          <r>г<s n="ani"/><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>го`в</l>
          <r>г<s n="ani"/><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>го`в</l>
          <r>г<s n="ani"/><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>га`х</l>
          <r>г<s n="ani"/><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>га`м</l>
          <r>г<s n="ani"/><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>га`ми</l>
          <r>г<s n="ani"/><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- [m.3*a] десят/ок__n -->
    <pardef n="десят/ок__n">
      <e c="m.3*a">
        <p>
          <l>ок</l>
          <r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ок</l>
          <r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ка</l>
          <r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ке</l>
          <r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ку</l>
          <r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ком</l>
          <r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ки</l>
          <r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ки</l>
          <r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ков</l>
          <r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ках</l>
          <r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>кам</l>
          <r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ками</l>
          <r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="бык"><i>бы'к</i><par n="бык__n"/></e>
    <e lm="берег"><i>бе'рег</i><par n="берег__n"/></e>
    <e lm="бок"><i>бо'к</i><par n="берег__n"/></e>
    <e lm="век"><i>ве'к</i><par n="берег__n"/></e>
    <e lm="бог"><i>бо'</i><par n="бо/г__n"/></e>
    <e lm="десяток"><i>деся'т</i><par n="десят/ок__n"/></e>
    <e lm="беспорядок"><i>беспоря'д</i><par n="десят/ок__n"/></e>
